test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-nusjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2: [нуӈгодакэн, нуӈгоданакэн]
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3: [нуӈгодакы, нуӈгоданакы]
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1: [нуӈгодакэни’, нуӈгоданакэни’]
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2: [нуӈгодакэди’, нуӈгоданакэди’]
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3: [нуӈгодакэхэ’, нуӈгоданакэхэ’]
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1: [нуӈгодакэва”, нуӈгоданакэва”]
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2: [нуӈгодакэда”, нуӈгоданакэда”]
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3: [нуӈгодакы”, нуӈгоданакы”]
     нусь+V+IV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1: [нухурцюдм’, нухурцядм’]
     нусь+V+IV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1: [нухурцюни’, нухурцяни’]
     нусь+V+IV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1: [нухурцюва”, нухурцява”]
     нусь+V+IV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2: нухур”
     нусь+V+IV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2: [нухур”ӈади’, нухурӈади’]
     нусь+V+IV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2: [нухур”ӈада”, нухурӈада”]
     нусь+V+IV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3: [нухур”ӈая, нухурӈая]
     нусь+V+IV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3: [нухур”ӈаяха’, нухурӈаяха’]
     нусь+V+IV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3: [нухур”ӈая”, нухурӈая”]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: [нусьтыдм’, нусетыдм’]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: [нусьтын, нусетын]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [нусьты, нусеты]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: [нусьтыни’, нусетыни’]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: [нусьтыди’, нусетыди’]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [нусьтыхы’, нусетыхы’]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: [нусьтыва”, нусетыва”]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: [нусьтыда”, нусетыда”]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [нусьты”, нусеты”]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1: [нусьтавэдм’, нусетавэдм’]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2: [нусьтавэн, нусетавэн]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3: [нусьтавы, нусетавы]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1: [нусьтавэни’, нусетавэни’]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2: [нусьтавэди’, нусетавэди’]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3: [нусьтавэхэ’, нусетавэхэ’]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1: [нусьтавэва”, нусетавэва”]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2: [нусьтавэда”, нусетавэда”]
     нусь+V+IV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3: [нусьтавы”, нусетавы”]
